Utah statutes.
56-1-20.   Operating employees to wear insignia.
Every conductor, baggage master, engineer, brakeman or other employee of a
railroad company, employed in a passenger train or at the stations for
passengers, shall wear upon his hat or cap or in some conspicuous place on the
breast of his coat a badge indicating his office or station, and, by its
initial letters, the name of the company by which he is employed; and no
collector or conductor without such badge shall demand or be entitled to
receive from any passenger any fare or ticket or exercise any of the powers of
his office or station or interfere with any passenger or his property.
